Wisconsin, session 2025, SB159.
do enact as follows:SB159,1Section 1. 347.25 (1m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:347.25 (1m) (b) If the vehicle is so equipped, the lights shall be illuminated as required under s. 346.03 or 346.215 (2) (a) when the operator of the police vehicle is exercising the privileges granted under s. 346.03 or 346.215 (2) (a). On a marked police vehicle with an exterior light bar, the blue light shall be mounted on the roof of the passenger side of the vehicle and the red light shall be mounted on the roof of the driver side of the vehicle. If lights are mounted inside the vehicle, blue lights shall be displayed on the interior of the passenger side of the vehicle and red lights shall be displayed on the interior of the driver side of the vehicle. On marked police vehicles with blue lights displayed on the passenger side roof or interior and red lights displayed on the driver side roof or interior, a combination of additional blue and red lights may be mounted on the front, sides, or rear of a police vehicle in any configuration. When in use on an unmarked police vehicle, the blue light shall be displayed on the passenger side of the vehicle and the red light shall be displayed on the driver side of the vehicle. The lights shall be designed and displayed so as to be plainly visible and understandable from a distance of 500 feet during normal sunlight and during hours of darkness. No operator of a police vehicle may use the warning lights except when responding to an emergency call or when in pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law, when responding to but not upon returning from a fire alarm, when necessarily parked on a highway in a position which is likely to be hazardous to traffic using the highway, or as authorized under s. 346.215 (2) (a). Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/sb159 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/sb159 enrolledbills/2025/REG/SB159 enrolledbills/2025/REG/SB159 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»SB159: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting